Wisconsin, session 2025, AB932.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Justice and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.AB932,11Section 1. 165.845 (1r) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB932,2,52165.845 (1r) (a) 1. Data requested by federal agencies under the U.S. 3department of justice, including but not limited to the federal bureau of 4investigation under its system of uniform crime reports the National Incident-5Based Reporting System for the United States.Note: This Section specifies the name of the federal program, under the Federal Bureau of Investigation, to which law enforcement agencies report crime data upon request.AB932,26Section 2. 939.632 (1) (e) 1. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 7Act 24, is amended to read:AB932,2,158939.632 (1) (e) 1. Any felony under s. 940.01, 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.09 9(1c), 940.21, 940.225 (1), (2) or (3), 940.235, 940.305, 940.31, 940.32, 940.60 (2) or (3) 10(a) or (b), 940.66 (2) (a) or (c), 941.20, 941.21, 943.02, 943.06, 943.10 (2), 943.231 (1), 11943.32 (2), 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) (a) or (c) or (5) (a) 1., 2., 3., or 4., 12948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.07, 948.08, 948.085, or 948.30 (2) or s. 940.19 (2), 132023 stats., s. 940.19 (4), 2023 stats., s. 940.19 (5), 2023 stats., s. 940.198 (2) (a), 142023 stats., or s. 940.198 (2) (c), 2023 stats., or under s. 940.302 (2) if s. 940.302 (2) 15(a) 1. b. applies.Note: This Section inserts, in a statute that defines certain felonies that are “violent crimes in a school zone,” a cross-reference to the crime of felony stalking.AB932,316Section 3. 939.632 (1) (e) 3. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 17Act 24, is amended to read:AB932,3,31939.632 (1) (e) 3. Any misdemeanor under s. 940.225 (3m), 940.32 (2), 940.42, 2940.44, 940.60 (1), 941.20 (1), 941.23, 941.231, 941.235, or 941.38 (3) or s. 940.19 3(1), 2023 stats.Note: This Section strikes, in a statute that lists certain misdemeanors as “violent crimes in a school zone,” a reference to the crime of stalking because it is not classified as a misdemeanor offense.AB932,3,44